Kentucky statutes. TITLE XX Alcoholic Beverages
CHAPTER 241 Alcoholic Beverages — Administration and Control
241.110.
County judge/executive as county administrator — Appointment of person other than county judge/executive — Investigators and clerks — Powers and jurisdiction — Constitutional oath.

The fiscal court of any county in which traffic in alcoholic beverages is not forbidden under KRS Chapter 242 may by resolution declare that regulation of the traffic in that county is necessary. The county judge/executive shall immediately constitute a county alcoholic beverage control administrator for the county. However, the county judge/executive may decline to accept this office, or after accepting the office, the county judge/executive may resign from the office, and in either event, notwithstanding the provisions of KRS

241.120

to and including KRS

241.150

, the county judge/executive may promptly appoint a person at least thirty (30) years of age, who at the time of the appointment has been a citizen of the state and a resident of that county for at least two (2) years next preceding the date of appointment, and who is able to qualify to serve at the pleasure of the county judge/executive as county alcoholic beverage control administrator for that county. Before entering upon the duties of county alcoholic beverage control administrator appointed by the county judge/executive, the appointee shall take the oath prescribed by Section 228 of the Constitution. Upon the qualification and appointment of this person as county alcoholic beverage control administrator for the county, the person shall immediately notify the department.

The compensation of the county alcoholic beverage control administrator, appointed by the county judge/executive, shall be fixed by the fiscal court in accordance with KRS

64.530

. The county judge/executive may also appoint any investigators and clerks deemed necessary for the proper conduct of the county alcoholic beverage control administrator’s office, their salaries likewise shall be fixed by the fiscal court pursuant to KRS

64.530

, and they will serve at the pleasure of the county judge/executive.

No person shall be a county alcoholic beverage control administrator, an investigator, or an employee of the county under the supervision of the county alcoholic beverage control administrator, who would be disqualified to be a member of the board under KRS

241.100

.

The county alcoholic beverage control administrator, appointed by the county judge/executive, and the administrator’s investigators, shall have full police powers of peace officers, and their jurisdiction shall be over the unincorporated areas of the county and within the corporate limits of any city in the county not having its own administrator. They may inspect any premises where alcoholic beverages are manufactured, sold, stored, or otherwise trafficked in, without first obtaining a search warrant.

Before entering upon official duties, each county administrator shall take the oath prescribed in Section 228 of the Constitution.

HISTORY:

2554b-110: amend. Acts 1954, ch. 139; 2017 ch. 62, § 9, effective June 29, 2017.

241.120.
Disqualification of county judge/executive — How vacancy filled — Appointee.

The county judge/executive shall be disqualified to act as county administrator by any fact that would disqualify a person under KRS

241.100

from acting as a member of the board.

If he is disqualified to act as county administrator, or if a vacancy in that office occurs for any other reason, the judge of the Circuit Court of that county shall appoint to that position a person at least thirty (30) years of age who, at the time of appointment, has been a citizen of the state and a resident of that county for at least two (2) years next preceding the date of appointment, and who is able to qualify.

The appointee shall serve during the unexpired portion of the term or until the county judge/executive is able and willing to qualify.

History.

2554b-110: amend. Acts 1944, ch. 154, § 10.

241.130.
Salary, oath and bond of county administrator. [Repealed]

History.

2554b-110; repealed by 2017 ch. 62, § 119, effective June 29, 2017.

241.140.
Functions of county administrator — Jurisdiction.

Each county administrator shall have the same duties and functions regarding local license applications and renewals as the department with respect to state licenses. Each county administrator shall have the same duties and functions regarding local license penalization as the board with respect to state license penalization. If any city appoints its own administrator under KRS

241.160

, the county administrator in that county shall have jurisdiction over only that portion of the county which lies outside the corporate limits of that city, unless the city does not have an adequate police force.

HISTORY:

2554b-110: amend. Acts 1998, ch. 522, § 27, effective July 15, 1998; 2010, ch. 24, § 555, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 18, § 2, effective June 29, 2017; 2017 ch. 62, § 10, effective June 29, 2017.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/29/2017). This statute was amended by
2017 Ky. Acts chs. 18 and
62, which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

241.150.
Appeals from decision or order of county administrator to board.

Appeals from a decision or order of a county administrator may be taken to the board by filing a notice of appeal with the board within thirty (30) days after the decision or order of the county administrator is mailed or delivered by personal service. The notice of appeal shall specify the county administrator by name and shall identify the decision or order, or part of the decision or order, being appealed. The notice shall contain a certificate that a copy of the notice has been served on the county administrator and shall be accompanied by a copy of the decision or order being appealed. Matters at issue shall be heard by the board as upon an original proceeding. Appeals from decisions or orders of the county administrator shall be governed by KRS Chapter 13B.

HISTORY:

2554b-110: amend. Acts 1998, ch. 121, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 2017 ch. 62, § 11, effective June 29, 2017.

241.160.
Wet or moist cities with population of 3,000 or more and consolidated local governments required to have city administrators — City administrators permitted in smaller cities.

The legislative body of any wet or moist city with a population equal to or greater than three thousand (3,000) or a consolidated local government shall by ordinance create the office of city alcoholic beverage control administrator, or shall assign the duties of this office to a presently established city office.

Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, the legislative body of any wet or moist city with a population of less than three thousand (3,000) may, by ordinance, create the office of city alcoholic beverage control administrator or shall assign the duties of the office to a presently established office.

If located in a county containing a consolidated local government, cities with a population of less than three thousand (3,000) shall not create the office of city alcoholic beverage control administrator. Any city under this subsection that had created the office of city alcoholic beverage control and appointed a person to that office prior to August 1, 2014, shall not be prohibited by this subsection.

HISTORY:

2554b-111: amend. Acts 1948, ch. 108, § 1; 2017 ch. 62, § 12, effective June 29, 2017.

241.170.
Appointment of city administrator and employees in cities of first class or consolidated local government — Police powers — Right to inspect premises — Appointment in other cities — Qualifications of city administrators and employees — Jurisdictional enforcement conflicts.

The city administrator in each city of the first class or the administrator in a consolidated local government, and any investigators and clerks deemed necessary for the proper conduct of this office, shall be appointed by the mayor. The city administrator in each city of the first class or the administrator in a county containing a consolidated local government, and the administrator’s investigators, shall have full police powers of peace officers, and their jurisdiction shall be coextensive with boundaries of the city of the first class or the boundaries of the county in a county containing a consolidated local government. They may inspect any premises where alcoholic beverages are manufactured, sold, stored, or otherwise trafficked in, without first obtaining a search warrant.

The city administrator in each city, other than a consolidated local government, shall be appointed by the city manager if there is one. If there is no city manager, the city administrator shall be appointed by the mayor.

No person shall be an administrator, an investigator, or an employee of the city or a consolidated local government under the supervision of the administrator, who would be disqualified to be a member of the board under KRS

241.100

.

Before entering upon official duties, each city administrator shall take the oath prescribed in Section 228 of the Constitution. An appointed city alcoholic beverage control administrator shall immediately notify the department of qualification and appointment.

HISTORY:

2554b-111: amend. Acts 1946, ch. 247; 2017 ch. 18, § 3, effective June 29, 2017; 2017 ch. 62, § 13, effective June 29, 2017.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/29/2017). This statute was amended by
2017 Ky. Acts chs. 18 and
62, which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

241.180.
Oath and bond of city administrator and employees. [Repealed]

History.

2554b-111; repealed by 2017 ch. 62, § 119, effective June 29, 2017.

241.190.
Functions of city administrator.

Each city administrator shall have the same duties and functions regarding local license applications and renewals as the department with respect to state licenses. Each city administrator shall have the same duties and functions regarding local license penalization as the board with respect to state license penalization.

HISTORY:

2554b-111: amend. Acts 1998, ch. 522, § 3, effective July 15, 1998; 2017 ch. 62, § 14, effective June 29, 2017.

241.200.
Appeals from decisions or orders of city administrator.

Appeals from a decision or order of each city administrator may be taken to the board by filing a notice of appeal with the board within thirty (30) days after the decision or order of the city administrator is mailed or delivered by personal service. The notice of appeal shall specify the city administrator by name and shall identify the decision or order, or part of the decision or order, being appealed. The notice shall contain a certificate that a copy of the notice has been served on the city administrator and shall be accompanied by a copy of the decision or order being appealed. Matters at issue shall be heard by the board as upon an original proceeding. Appeals from decisions or orders of the city administrator shall be governed by KRS Chapter 13B.

HISTORY:

2554b-111: amend. Acts 1998, ch. 522, § 4, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 435, § 2, effective July 14, 2000; 2017 ch. 62, § 15, effective June 29, 2017.

241.220.
Urban-county administrator.

The legislative body of any urban-county government in which traffic in alcoholic beverages is not forbidden by KRS Chapter 242 shall by ordinance create the office of urban-county alcoholic beverage control administrator.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 194, § 1, effective June 17, 1978.

241.230.
Appointment and duties of administrator, investigators, and clerks — Constitutional oath.

The urban-county administrator in each urban-county government and any investigators and clerks deemed necessary for the proper conduct of the office, shall be appointed by the mayor. The urban-county administrator, and the urban-county administrator’s investigators, shall have full police powers of peace officers, and their jurisdiction shall be coextensive with the urban- county governments. They may inspect any premises where alcoholic beverages are manufactured, sold, stored, or otherwise trafficked in, without first obtaining a search warrant.

No person shall be an urban-county administrator, an investigator, or an employee of the urban-county government under the supervision of the urban-county administrator, who would be disqualified to be a member of the board under KRS

241.100

.

Before entering upon official duties, each urban-county administrator shall take the oath prescribed in Section 228 of the Constitution. An appointed urban-county alcoholic beverage control administrator shall immediately notify the department of qualification and appointment.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 194, § 2, effective June 17, 1978; 2017 ch. 62, § 16, effective June 29, 2017.

241.240.
Bond. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 194, § 3, effective June 17, 1978; repealed by 2017 ch. 62, § 119, effective June 29, 2017.

241.250.
Functions and duties of urban-county administrator.

Each urban-county administrator shall have the same duties and functions regarding local license applications and renewals as the department with respect to state licenses. Each urban-county administrator shall have the same duties and functions regarding local license penalization as the board with respect to state license penalization.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 194, § 4, effective June 17, 1978; 1998, ch. 522, § 5, effective July 15, 1998; 2017 ch. 62, § 17, effective June 29, 2017.

241.260.
Appeals from urban-county administrator’s decision or order.

Appeals from a decision or order of each urban-county administrator may be taken to the board by filing a notice of appeal with the board within thirty (30) days after the decision or order of the urban-county administrator is mailed or delivered by personal service. The notice of appeal shall specify the urban- county administrator by name and shall identify the decision or order, or part of the decision or order, being appealed. The notice shall contain a certificate that a copy of the notice has been served on the urban-county administrator and shall be accompanied by a copy of the decision or order being appealed. Matters at issue shall be heard by the board as upon an original proceeding. Appeals from decisions or orders of the urban-county administrator shall be governed by KRS Chapter 13B.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 194, § 5, effective June 17, 1978; 1998, ch. 522, § 6, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 435, § 3, effective July 14, 2000; 2017 ch. 62, § 18, effective June 29, 2017.

241.990.
Penalties.

Any person who after an opportunity to be heard is found by the commissioner to have violated any of the provisions of KRS

241.100

, or acted as county administrator in violation of subsection (1) of KRS

241.120

, or acted as city administrator or a city employee in violation of subsection (3) of KRS

241.170

, or acted as an urban-county administrator in violation of KRS

241.230

, shall automatically vacate his office or position, and upon conviction by a court, he shall be guilty of a Class D felony.

History.

2554b-106, 2554b-110, 2554b-111: amend. Acts 1978, ch. 194, § 6, effective June 17, 1978; 1992, ch. 463, § 29, effective July 14, 1992; 2010, ch. 24, § 557, effective July 15, 2010.